Maine, session 132, LD908.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to eliminate the 8% sales tax on all prepared foods, including meals
served in restaurants, for the purpose of boosting economic activity by making dining out
more affordable. The Department of Economic and Community Development would be
required to initiate an advertising campaign to encourage tourism in Maine and promote
dining establishments as tax-free, with the exception of alcoholic beverages.
The loss of revenue from the repeal of the sales tax on prepared foods would be offset
in a number of ways, including:
1. Broadening the items subject to sales tax and increasing the rate of the sales tax on
certain high-end luxury items, such as bicycles, boating gear and other recreational
equipment; high-end electronics, such as smartphones and laptops; and elective medical
procedures that are not medically necessary;
2. Performing an assessment of sales tax exemptions on nonessential goods and
services to ensure that only those exemptions that are intended to provide a fair system of
taxation are retained; and
3. Conducting a comprehensive audit of state government programs and expenditures
to eliminate inefficiencies and waste.
Page 1 - 132LR0603(01)